test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-abmas_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjektiv - abmas: # 
    abmas+A+Attr: amas

    abmas+A+Sg+Nom: amas
    abmas+A+Pl+Nom: abmasa

    abmas+A+Sg+Gen: abmasa
    abmas+A+Sg+Acc: abmasav
    abmas+A+Sg+Ill: abmasij
    abmas+A+Sg+Ine: abmasin
    abmas+A+Sg+Ela: [abmasist, abmasis]
    abmas+A+Sg+Com: abmasijn
    abmas+A+Pl+Gen: abmasij
    abmas+A+Pl+Acc: abmasijd
    abmas+A+Pl+Ill: abmasijda
    abmas+A+Pl+Ine: abmasijn
    abmas+A+Pl+Ela: [abmasijst, abmasijs]
    abmas+A+Pl+Com: [abmasij, abmasijgum]
#    abmas+A+Ess: abmasan

    abmas+A+Comp+Attr: abmasup

    abmas+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: abmasup
    abmas+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: abmasubo

    abmas+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: abmasubo
    abmas+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: abmasubov
    abmas+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: abmasuboj
    abmas+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: abmasubon
    abmas+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: [abmasubost, abmasubos]
    abmas+A+Comp+Sg+Com: [abmasubojn, abmasubojna]
    abmas+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: abmasuboj
    abmas+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: abmasubojd
    abmas+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: abmasubojda
    abmas+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: abmasubojn
    abmas+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: [abmasubojst, abmasubojs]
    abmas+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [abmasuboj, abmasubojgum]
#    abmas+A+Comp+Ess: abmasubon

    abmas+A+Superl+Attr: abmasumos

    abmas+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: abmasumos
    abmas+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: abmasubmusa

    abmas+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: abmasubmusa
    abmas+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: abmasubmusav
    abmas+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: abmasubmusij
    abmas+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: abmasubmusin
    abmas+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: [abmasubmusist, abmasubmusis]
    abmas+A+Superl+Sg+Com: abmasubmusijn
    abmas+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: abmasubmusij
    abmas+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: abmasubmusijd
    abmas+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: abmasubmusijda
    abmas+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: abmasubmusijn
    abmas+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: [abmasubmusijst, abmasubmusijs]
    abmas+A+Superl+Pl+Com: [abmasubmusij, abmasubmusijgum]
#    abmas+A+Superl+Ess: abmasubmusan
